src/sms-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

Multichar_Symbols
 +A +V
 
 +Pred +Attr
 
 +N +Adv
 +Pron +CS +CC +Adp +Po +Pr +Interj +Pcle
 +Pers +Dem +Interr +Refl +Recipr +Rel +Indef
 +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Acc +Ill +Ine +Ela +Com +Ess +Par +Abe
 +PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
 +Comp +Superl +Actor
 +Action ! <========= hmm Actio?
+ActEss ! -men
+AktEss ! fix!
+NegConv2 ! fix!
 +Clt
 +Act  +Pass +Ind +Prs +Prt +Pot +Cond +Imprt +ImprtII +Sup
 +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
 +4 ! ??? fourth person, look into..
 +Inf 
 +GerTemp ! -een  
 +GerInstr ! -eel 
 +ConNeg +Neg +PrsPrc +PrfPrc +VGen +VAbess
 +Imprt
 +Prop +Ani +Mal +Fem +Sur +Plc +Org +Obj ! Semantic properties of names

 +CLB +PUNCT +HYPH +PAR
 č đ ǧ ǩ n1 ŧ š ǯ ž
 ǥ m2 n2 h2
 b3 d3 g3 m3 h3
 %^P3 ! elaine-type diacritic
 %^DIADEL ! deleting diacritic
 %^DIAINS ! inserting diacritic
  %^1VOW %^2VOW %^3VOW %^4VOW %^5VOW !vowel position and length
 X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9
 Ǯ Ʒ Q3 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 Q9
 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9
 %^CXLong %^CLong %^CShort
 %^VOWSH !
 %^VOWL ! for lengthening
 %^VOWXL ! for extralengthening
 %^VOWLower ! for lowering
 %^VOWRaise ! for raising
 %^VOWFront ! for fronting
 %^PAL ! for placing palatalization mark _ˊ_
 QÂ1 ! used with _mainsted_
 QA1 ! used with _vuejted_
 QE1 ! used with _kåˊmrded_
 %^IMPSG2
 %^INDPRSSG3 
! Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <


! =================================================
! Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files
! =================================================

LEXICON Root
 AdjectiveRoot ;
 NounRoot ;
 ProperNoun ;
 VerbRoot ;
! Adverb ;
! Particle ;
 Subjunction ;
 Conjunction ;
! Adposition ;
!! Postposition ;
!! Preposition ;
 Interjection ;
 Pronoun ;
 Numeral ;
 Punctuation ;



! ===========================
! Sublexica for AdjectiveRoot
! ===========================

! AdjClass1 suffixes STR-âd (pred) / STR_PAL-es (attr)
! -------
LEXICON A1
+A+Pred:‚d # ;

! AdjClass2 suffixes WK-âs (pred) / STR-Ø (attr)
! -------
LEXICON A2
#;
! AdjClass3 suffixes STR-Ø (pred) / WK-es (attr)
! -------
LEXICON A3

#;
! Comparation
! -----------


! Comparative
! -----------


! Superlative
! -----------



!! ! ======================
!! ! Sublexica for NounRoot
!! ! ======================
!! 
!! ! Temporary lexicon for the oahpa words
!! 
!! LEXICON n
!! +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
!! 
!! 
!! ! Even-syllable stems
!! ! -------------------
!! 
!! ! 2syll stems
!! ! - - - - - -
!! 
!! ! 4syll stems
!! ! - - - - - -
!! 
!! 
!! ! Nominal substems
!! ! - - - - - - - -
!! 
!! ! Odd-syllable stems
!! ! ------------------
!! 
!! ! Odd-syllable stems, sublexica
!! ! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
!! 
!! ! Contracted stems
!! ! ----------------
!! 
!! 
!! 
!! ! ======================
!! ! Sublexica for VerbRoot
!! ! ======================
!! 
!! ! Even-syllable stems
!! ! -------------------
!! 
!! LEXICON VIQQAD
!! +V+Inf:‚d # ;
!! +V+Ind+Prs: VS-I ;
!! 
!! LEXICON TEEVVAD
!! +V+Ind+Prs:		VSUF-IA-PRS ;
!! +V+Ind+Prt:		VSUF-IA-PRT ;
!! +V+Imprt:			VSUF-IA-IMP ;
!! +V:X3			VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
!! +V+Pot+Sg3:X3až	FINAL1 ; !WG
!! +V+Inf:ad # ;
!! +V+Ger:men # ;
!! +V+Aktio:am # ;
!! +V+VAbess:X3kâni # ;		!WG
!! 
!! 
!! LEXICON POORRÂD
!! +V+Ind+Prs:		VSUF-IÂ-PRS ;
!! +V+Ind+Prt:		VSUF-IÂ-PRT ;
!! +V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:X3 # ;
!! +V+Imprt:			VSUF-IÂ-IMP ;
!! +V:X3				VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
!! +V+Pot+Sg3:X3âž	FINAL1 ; !WG
!! +V+Inf:âd # ;
!! +V+PrfPrc:âm # ;
!! +V+Ger:men # ;
!! +V+Aktio:âm # ;
!! +V+VAbess:X3kâni # ;			!WG
!! 
!! LEXICON TIETTED
!! +V+Ind+Prs:		VSUF-IE-PRS ;
!! +V+Ind+Prt:		VSUF-IE-PRT ;
!! +V+Imprt:			VSUF-IE-IMP ;
!! +V:X3				VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
!! +V+Pot+Sg3:X3ež	FINAL1 ; !WG
!! +V+Inf:%^5VOWed # ;
!! +V+Ger:men # ;
!! +V+Aktio:em # ;
!! +V+VAbess:X3kâni # ;			!WG
!! 
!! 
!! ! Odd-syllable stems
!! ! ------------------
!! ! Contracted stems
!! ! ----------------
!! 
!! 
!! ! Intermediate suffix lexica
!! ! --------------------------
!! 
!! 
!! ! Final suffix lexica
!! ! -------------------
!! 
!! ! Suffix series I
!! ! - - - - - - - -
!! 
!! LEXICON VS-I
!! +Sg1:am # ;
!! +Sg2:ak # ;
!! +Sg3:%^P3 # ;
!! +Pl1:‚p # ;
!! +Pl2:ve`ted # ;
!! +Pl3:e%^P3 # ;
!! 
!! ! Present tense
!! ! - - - - - - - -
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IA-PRS
!!  +Sg1:X3am			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Sg2:X3ak			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Sg3:				FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl1:ap			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl1:ap			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl2:ve,ted		FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl3:%^VOWSHa		FINAL1	;
!!  ! epämääräinen pers.			!WG
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IÂ-PRS
!!  +Sg1:X3âm			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Sg2:X3ak			FINAL1	; !WG
!! ! +Sg3:%^1VOW			FINAL1	;
!!  +Sg3:			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl1:âp			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl1:%^DIAINSâp			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl2:ve,ted		FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl3:%^4VOWe		FINAL1	;
!!  ! epämääräinen pers.			!WG
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IE-PRS
!!  +Sg1:X3%^1VOWam		FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Sg2:X3%^1VOWak		FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Sg3:%^1VOW			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl1:ep			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl2:ve,ted		FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl3:%^4VOWe		FINAL1	;
!!  ! epämääräinen pers.			!WG
!! 
!! 
!! ! Past tense
!! ! - - - - - - - -
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IA-PRT
!!  +Sg1:%^2VOWum		FINAL1	; !đđ>dd
!!  +Sg2:%^2VOWuk		FINAL1	; !đđ>dd
!!  +Sg3:X3ai			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl1:X3aim			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl2:X3aid			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl3:%^2VOWu		FINAL1	;
!!  ! epämääräinen pers.
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IÂ-PRT
!!  +Sg1:%^VOWSHem			FINAL1	; 
!!  +Sg2:%^VOWSHiǩ			FINAL1	; 
!! ! +Sg1:%^3VOWem		FINAL1	;
!! ! +Sg2:%^3VOWiǩ		FINAL1	;
!!  +Sg3:X3i				FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl1:X3im			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl2:X3id			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl3:%^3VOWe		FINAL1	;
!!  ! epämääräinen pers.
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IE-PRT
!!  +Sg1:%^3VOWem		FINAL1	;
!!  +Sg2:%^3VOWiǩ		FINAL1	;
!!  +Sg3:X3%^3VOWi		FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl1:X3%^3VOWim		FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl2:X3id		FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl3:%e		FINAL1	;
!!  ! epämääräinen pers.
!! 
!! 
!! ! Imperative
!! ! - - - - - - -
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IA-IMP
!!  +Sg2:X3				FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Sg3:X3as			FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl1:ap			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl2:ad			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl3:%^VOWSHaz		FINAL1	;
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IÂ-IMP
!!  +Sg2:X3				FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Sg3:X3%^1VOWas		FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl1:âp			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl2:âd			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl3:%^1VOWaz		FINAL1	; !%^VOWSH also ??
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-IE-IMP
!!  +Sg2:X3				FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Sg3:X3%^1VOWas		FINAL1	; !WG
!!  +Pl1:ep			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl2:ed			FINAL1	;
!!  +Pl3:%^1VOWaz		FINAL1	;
!! 
!! 
!! ! Potentialis & Konditionalis
!! ! not including +Pot+Sg3
!! ! - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
!! 
!! LEXICON VSUF-I-POTKOND
!!  +Pot+Sg1:žem		FINAL1	;
!!  +Pot+Sg2:žiǩ		FINAL1	;
!!  +Pot+Pl1:žep		FINAL1	;
!!  +Pot+Pl2:žid		FINAL1	;
!!  +Pot+Pl3:že		FINAL1	;
!!  ! epäm. pot.
!!  +Cond+Sg1:čem		FINAL1	;
!!  +Cond+Sg2:čiǩ		FINAL1	;
!!  +Cond+Sg3:či		FINAL1	;
!!  +Cond+Pl1:čep		FINAL1	;
!!  +Cond+Pl2:čid		FINAL1	;
!!  +Cond+Pl3:če		FINAL1	;
!!  ! epäm. cond.
!! 
!! 
!! ! Suffix series II
!! ! - - - - - - - -
!! 
!! ! Other series
!! ! - - - - - -
!! 
!! 
!! ! Auxiliary verbs
!! ! ---------------




! Sublexica for possessive suffixes
! =================================


LEXICON K
 # ;
! +Clt:clitic # ;

! Final lexicon
! =============


LEXICON FINAL1
			#	;
